Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.290

Return of parole violators from another state—Deputization procedure.

Any deputization pursuant to this statute with regard to an offender convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984, shall be in writing and any person authorized to act as an agent of this state pursuant hereto shall carry formal evidence of his or her deputization and shall produce the same upon demand.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 345; 1955 c 183 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.